test/src/morphology/N-huedsi21_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hüdsi: # Noun (21) hüdsi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Nom: hüdsi
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Gen: hüdse
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Par: hüst
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ill: hüste
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Gen: [hütsi, hüste]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Par: hütsi
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ill: [hütsihe, hütsi]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+All: [hüdsile, hüstele]
